Georgia statutes. 
Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For annual survey of construction law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2004).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

The 1962 Home Rule Act was intended to allow municipalities to exercise certain powers themselves, not to define the means by which the cities would and could manage a municipalities' affairs. Sadler v. Nijem, 251 Ga. 375, 306 S.E.2d 257 (1983).

No municipal corporations possess inherent powers; instead, the corporations possess only such powers as are expressly delegated by the legislature. Evidence of express delegation by the legislature is found in the charter of each municipality. Palmer v. Hall, 380 F. Supp. 120 (M.D. Ga. 1974), modified, 517 F.2d 705 (5th Cir. 1975).

Powers and authority of mayor and aldermen derived from city charter. - Legislature has not enacted general laws giving any general powers to either mayors or aldermen of municipal corporations. Therefore, the powers and authority of the mayor and aldermen are derived from the charter of the city. Palmer v. Hall, 380 F. Supp. 120 (M.D. Ga. 1974), modified, 517 F.2d 705 (5th Cir. 1975).

Conflicting special law unconstitutional. - Georgia Laws 1968, p. 2953, providing for collective bargaining for Chatham County public employees, violates Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV), since it is a special law dealing with matters provided for by the general law under Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, §§ 1 and 2 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-34-1 and 36-34-2). Local 574, Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters v. Floyd, 225 Ga. 625, 170 S.E.2d 394 (1969).

Taxpayer actions. - Local government provisions applicable to municipal corporations do not provide for derivative actions by taxpayers in the name of a municipality. Taxpayers may bring direct actions in mandamus to compel or enjoin city officials to perform a public duty or sue city officials for damages in connection with the unlawful expenditure of public funds with any recovery to be paid to the city. Common Cause/Ga. v. Campbell, 268 Ga. App. 599, 602 S.E.2d 333 (2004), aff'd, 279 Ga. 480, 614 S.E.2d 761 (2005).

Cited in Allison v. Medlock, 224 Ga. 37, 159 S.E.2d 384 (1968); Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971); Paige v. Gray, 437 F. Supp. 137 (M.D. Ga. 1977); CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 196 F. Supp. 2d 1288 (S.D. Ga. 2002).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 10.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 139 et seq.

36-34-2. Powers relating to administration of government generally.

Statute text

In addition to the other powers which it may have, the governing body of any municipal corporation shall have the following powers, under this chapter, relating to the administration of municipal government:

(1) The power to establish municipal offices, agencies, and employments;

(2) The power to define, regulate, and alter the powers, duties, qualifications, compensation, and tenure of all municipal officers, agents, and employees, provided that the members of the municipal governing body shall not have the right to fix or change their own terms or the terms of their successors, nor to alter their own salaries or compensation, except pursuant to the authority of Code Section 36-35-4, nor to alter such duties or responsibilities as are specifically given to a particular elective official by charter;

(3) The power to authorize any of the officers, agents, and employees of the municipal corporation to serve, in any manner prescribed by applicable law, any process, summons, notice, or order on all persons, as defined in Code Section 1-3-3 therein named, when:

(A) The paper to be served arises out of or relates to an activity or condition conducted or maintained by such person within the territorial jurisdiction of the municipal corporation in violation of an applicable law or ordinance; and

(B) The paper to be served originates in or is issued under the authority of the department or branch of municipal government employing such officer, agent, or employee.

Where any such paper names one or more persons who reside outside the territorial jurisdiction of the municipal corporation, the several sheriffs, marshals, and constables of the several counties of this state are authorized and directed to serve any such paper and make appropriate return of such service by them, as other process is served and returned, on such named persons residing in their respective jurisdictions, upon receipt of a written request to make such service, for the fees allowed for service of process issued by the superior courts of this state;

(4) The power to establish merit systems, retirement systems, and insurance plans for all municipal employees and to establish insurance plans for school employees of independent municipal systems and to provide the method or methods of financing such systems and plans;

(5) The power to contract with any state department or agency or any other political subdivision for joint services or the exchange of services; to contract with such agencies or subdivisions for the joint use of facilities or equipment; and to contract with any state agency or political subdivision to perform any service or execute any project for such agency or subdivision in which the municipal corporation has an interest;

(6) The power to legislate, regulate, and administer all matters pertaining to absentee voting in municipal elections; and

(7) (A) The power to grant franchises to or make contracts with railroads, street railways, or urban transportation companies, electric light or power companies, gas companies, steam-heat companies, telephone companies, water companies, and other public utilities for the use and occupancy of the streets of the city, for the purpose of rendering utility services, upon such conditions and for such time as the governing authority of the municipal corporation may deem wise and subject to the Constitution and the general laws of this state.

(B) The amount of fees collected from customers of public utilities or companies as a result of franchise agreements or contracts authorized by this paragraph shall be itemized on bills or invoices transmitted to customers for utility services. The requirements of this subparagraph shall not apply to fees that are included in the system-wide charges or base rates of a public utility or company subject to a franchise agreement or contract.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 778, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 188, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 645, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1989, p. 812, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2122, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1189, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 164, § 1/HB 107; Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 2/HB 1115.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Home rule powers of municipalities, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Paras. I-VII.

Extent of interest obtainable by condemnor upon condemnation, § 22-2-85.

Taxation of special franchises, § 48-5-420 et seq.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "compensation" was substituted for "compensations" in paragraph (2).

Law reviews. - For article, "The Use of the Police Power by Local Governments and Some Problems of Intergovernmental Relations," see 8 J. of Pub. L. 109 (1959). For article, "Local Government and Contracts that Bind," see 3 Ga. L. Rev. 546 (1969).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Public Employees

Franchises

General Consideration

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions prior to enactment of this Code section are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Section not retrospective in operation. - There is no intent expressed in paragraph (7) of O.C.G.A. § 36-34-2 or any of the remaining portions of that section which express an intent that the section be retrospective in the section's operation or act as a ratification for prior acts of a municipality. Blue Ridge Tel. Co. v. City of Blue Ridge, 161 Ga. App. 452, 288 S.E.2d 705 (1982).

Municipal corporation is a political division of the state, and is a public corporation, having for the municipality's object the administration of a portion of the power of government delegated to the municipality for such purpose. It is a creature of the General Assembly and the municipality's charter powers may be enlarged, lessened, or completely withdrawn at the will of the municipality's creator. Spence v. Rowell, 213 Ga. 145, 97 S.E.2d 350 (1957) (decided under former Code 1933, § 22-103).

Nature of powers possessed by municipal corporation. - Municipal corporation possesses, and can exercise, the following powers, and no others: first, those granted in express words; second, those necessarily or fairly implied; third, those essential to the declared objects and purposes of the corporation - not simply convenient, but indispensable. Jewel Tea Co. v. City Council, 59 Ga. App. 260, 200 S.E. 503 (1938) (decided under former law).

Freedom to interpret powers. - Grant of authority under O.C.G.A. § 36-34-2 does not define the means by which the cities would and could manage the city's affairs or prohibit municipal governing authorities from choosing how such powers shall be exercised. City of Atlanta v. McKinney, 265 Ga. 161, 454 S.E.2d 517 (1995).

Any fair, reasonable doubt concerning the existence of power is resolved by the courts against the municipal corporation. Jewel Tea Co. v. City Council, 59 Ga. App. 260, 200 S.E. 503 (1938) (decided under former law).

Disposition of business by resolution. - Proper disposition of administrative business by council of municipal corporation is by resolution. Allen v. Wise, 204 Ga. 415, 50 S.E.2d 69 (1948) (decided under Ga. L. 1898, pp. 255, 256).

Estoppel of council to question legality of election. - When a council by mistake of law duly advertised and held an election at the wrong time, participating as candidates themselves, the council are estopped from bringing an action quo warranto to question legality. Dorsey v. Ansley, 72 Ga. 460 (1884) (decided under Ga. L. 1872, p. 19).

City cannot regulate construction of substation on power company's property. - City did not have the authority, under O.C.G.A. § 36-34-2(7), to regulate the construction of a power substation on property owned by the power company since the city's authority was limited to a utility's use of city property. City of Buford v. Ga. Power Co., 276 Ga. 590, 581 S.E.2d 16 (2003).

No contractual agreement established with city through statutes or ordinances. - In a suit brought by taxi cab companies, the trial court properly granted the city's motion to dismiss because the taxi cab companies failed to established that the statutes permitting the issuance of Certificates of Public Necessity and Convenience (CPNC), or the city's ordinances, created a clear and unequivocal intent by the city to create a contractual or franchise agreement that prevented the city to allow personal transportation network companies to operate in the city. Atlanta Metro Leasing, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 353 Ga. App. 785, 839 S.E.2d 278 (2020).

Cited in Georgia Power Co. v. Zimmerman, 133 Ga. App. 786, 213 S.E.2d 12 (1975); Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978); Brown v. City of E. Point, 152 Ga. App. 801, 264 S.E.2d 267 (1979); City of Athens v. McGahee, 178 Ga. App. 76, 341 S.E.2d 855 (1986); City of LaGrange v. Troup County Elec. Membership Corp., 200 Ga. App. 418, 408 S.E.2d 708 (1991); Clark v. City of Zebulon, 156 F.R.D. 684 (N.D. Ga. 1993); Angell v. Hart, 232 Ga. App. 222, 501 S.E.2d 594 (1998).

Public Employees

Special legislation may not place restrictions in the form of mandatory collective bargaining upon the unlimited powers granted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-34-2) Local 574, Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters v. Floyd, 225 Ga. 625, 170 S.E.2d 394 (1969).

Conflicting special law unconstitutional. - Georgia Laws 1968, p. 2953, providing for collective bargaining for Chatham County public employees, violates Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV) since it is a special law dealing with matters provided for by the general law under Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, §§ 1 and 2 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-34-1 and 36-34-2). Local 574, Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters v. Floyd, 225 Ga. 625, 170 S.E.2d 394 (1969).

Collective bargaining not required. - Powers of a municipality to regulate terms of employment may be executed by a city in any manner the city chooses, in the exercise of the city's nondelegable discretion. A city is not required to bargain collectively with any person or organization as to those powers. Local 574, Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters v. Floyd, 225 Ga. 625, 170 S.E.2d 394 (1969).

City ordinance increasing pension plan contribution rate. - Trial court properly granted the city defendants summary judgment on the city employees' claims of breach of contract and unconstitutional impairment of contract regarding an ordinance increasing their pension plan contribution rate because the Georgia General Assembly expressly contemplated that a municipal corporation's provision for employee retirement or pension benefits would be subject to being supplemented by local law. Borders v. City of Atlanta, 298 Ga. 188, 779 S.E.2d 279 (2015).

Franchises

Granting by municipality of franchise to distribute electricity in municipality is not an ultra vires act. Singer v. City of Cordele, 225 Ga. 323, 168 S.E.2d 138 (1969).

When power to grant franchises stems from paragraph (7) of Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A § 36-34-2), there is no violation of former Code 1933, § 69-202 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-30-3). City of Lithonia v. Georgia Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 238 Ga. 339, 232 S.E.2d 832 (1977).

Municipality can set conditions. - Municipality has the authority to condition the grant of a franchise upon requirements as the municipality deems wise. Athens-Clarke County v. Walton Elec. Membership Corp., 265 Ga. 229, 454 S.E.2d 510 (1995).

Authority of city to charge franchise fee. - In O.C.G.A. § 46-3-14(b), nothing in the first sentence purports to prohibit a city from conditioning the city's grant of a street franchise to an electric company upon the payment of a reasonable franchise fee, and the second sentence is a statutory preservation of the right of a "municipality" under paragraph (7) of O.C.G.A. § 36-34-2 to charge "any secondary supplier" a franchise fee, even when the municipality itself is also the primary supplier. City of Calhoun v. North Ga. Elec. Membership Corp., 264 Ga. 205, 443 S.E.2d 469 (1994).

Effect of rate schedule compatible with exercise of municipality's discretion in granting franchises. - Jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission stems from the Georgia Constitution. Therefore, any indirect effect which a rate schedule might have upon a municipality's exercise of the municipality's discretion in granting franchises is entirely compatible with the authority granted the municipalities by paragraph (7) of this section. City of Lithonia v. Georgia Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 238 Ga. 339, 232 S.E.2d 832 (1977).

Electric company must show right to erect poles in land of highway. - To justify setting up the company's poles in the land of a highway, a company which uses poles and wires in the transmission of electric currents must show that the company has acquired the right to do so, either by consent or condemnation from the owner of the soil. The designation by the municipality of the street where the poles may be set up is not enough. Donalson v. Georgia Power & Light Co., 175 Ga. 462, 165 S.E. 440 (1932).

Acquiescence in use of streets by telephone company. - Acquiescence of the city during the period from the 1962 enactment of paragraph (7) of O.C.G.A. § 36-34-2 to the date of the judgment in the trial court, the city's acquiescence in the use of the city streets and the operation of the telephone system, is sufficient conduct on the part of the city so as to estop the city from denying the authority of the defendant telephone company to use the city streets during that period; but as the city's acquiescence did not carry any promise, explicit or implicit, that the city would allow this fait accompli to continue for any definite time or for any time into the future whatsoever, there is no basis upon which the city may be restrained from exercising the city's powers to abrogate this present informal arrangement. Blue Ridge Tel. Co. v. City of Blue Ridge, 161 Ga. App. 452, 288 S.E.2d 705 (1982).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

City may establish personnel department and merit board without the necessity of special Acts of the General Assembly. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-310.

City may set up retirement system for city employees without necessity of amending city charter. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-80.

State law does not prohibit grant of franchise to community antenna television system by municipality; cable television is not regulated by the Georgia Public Service Commission. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-190.

State not exempt from franchise fee when paid indirectly. - While the state might not be required to pay a franchise fee or other tax directly to a city, in those situations where the state is paying money to a company, and that company is in turn remitting the money to the city as a franchise fee, it cannot be said that the state is the entity which is subject to the legal incidence of the tax so that it could successfully assert an exemption from such fees. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 76-42.

Payment for utilities by department unaffected by taxes paid to municipality. - Obligation of the Department of Administrative Services to pay for utilities at an established rate is not affected by the fact that the sums paid may include or reflect taxes paid by the provider of the services to a municipality. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 76-42.

Municipal contributions to day care center. - Unless a provision in the city charter allows such an expenditure, a city may not contribute to a day care center. 1984 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U84-14.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 163 et seq., 224, 236.

C.J.S. - 29 C.J.S., Election, § 345 et seq. 37 C.J.S., Franchises, §§ 26, 27. 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 143, 178, 416, 417, 490 et seq. 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 863 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1169, 1171, 1178, 1180, 1181, 1192, 1292 et seq., 1896 et seq.

ALR. - Power of municipality to assume the duty of providing and maintaining railroad crossings, 1 A.L.R. 316.

Power of public service commission to increase franchise rates, 3 A.L.R. 730; 9 A.L.R. 1165; 28 A.L.R. 587; 29 A.L.R. 356.

Power of municipal council to correct its minutes, 3 A.L.R. 1308.

Power of municipality to exact license tax or fee from interurban carrier, 31 A.L.R. 594.

Power of municipal corporation to take out liability insurance, 33 A.L.R. 717.

Forfeiture of street railway franchise for breach of condition, 34 A.L.R. 1413.

Power of municipal corporation to purchase or charter a boat or barge, 39 A.L.R. 1332.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration, 40 A.L.R. 1370.

Liability of municipal corporation upon implied contract for use of property which it received under an invalid contract, 42 A.L.R. 632.

Liability of municipality as affected by license issued by municipal officer, 42 A.L.R. 1208.

Power of municipal corporation or authorities to employ detective, 45 A.L.R. 737.

Liability of municipal corporations and their licensees for the torts of independent contractors, 52 A.L.R. 1012.

Power of municipality to transfer or assign its right to enforce assessment or lien for local improvements, 55 A.L.R. 667.

Power of municipality to maintain public hack stand on property of carrier, 56 A.L.R. 767.

Power of municipal corporation to fix rates of motor vehicles for hire, 65 A.L.R. 1364.

Power of board to appoint officer or make contract extending beyond its own term, 70 A.L.R. 794; 149 A.L.R. 336.

Duration of street franchise without fixed term, beyond the life of the grantee, 71 A.L.R. 121.

Discretion of civil service commission as regards promotional examinations for eligible list, 75 A.L.R. 1234.

Power to include in municipal contract or proposal therefor, provisions designed to relieve local unemployment, or encourage local industries, 81 A.L.R. 255.

Power of municipality to fix specific scale of wages or hours for employees of contractors or subcontractors for municipal contracts, 81 A.L.R. 349; 129 A.L.R. 763.

Power of municipal corporation to employ attorney, 83 A.L.R. 135.

Power of municipality to extend license regulation or occupation tax beyond its own territorial limits, 86 A.L.R. 917.

Rights, duties, and remedy in respect of leasing or hiring public property to private person for occasional use, 86 A.L.R. 1175.

Estoppel of municipality to deny that it gave its consent to street franchise, 89 A.L.R. 619.

Profit factor in determining rates for municipally owned or operated public utility, 90 A.L.R. 700.

Disposition of revenues from operation of revenue-producing enterprise owned by municipal corporation, 103 A.L.R. 579; 165 A.L.R. 854.

Power of municipal corporation, as adjunct of public utility service furnished by it, to sell to consumers equipment necessary or convenient for use of the service, 108 A.L.R. 1454.

Power of municipality to classify for purposes of taxation as affected by classification made by state or its failure to classify, 110 A.L.R. 1203.

Right and duty of city and public utility upon expiration by limitation of street franchise, 112 A.L.R. 625.

Power of county or municipality to exempt from taxation or otherwise aid or subsidize private enterprises conducted for recreational, exhibition, or entertainment purposes, 116 A.L.R. 889.

Right of municipality to invoke constitutional provisions against acts of state legislature, 116 A.L.R. 1037.

Right of municipality or other political subdivision to enforce against other party contract which was in excess of former's power, or which did not comply with the conditions of its power in that regard, 122 A.L.R. 1370.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivisions to engage in a joint project or enterprise, 123 A.L.R. 997.

Municipal ordinance relating to persons engaged in specified occupations or professions as applicable to officials or employees of state or political subdivision other than the municipality, 123 A.L.R. 1383.

Municipal license as affecting municipality's exercise of police power adversely to licensee, 124 A.L.R. 523.

Inclusion of different franchise rights or purposes in same ordinance, 127 A.L.R. 1049.

Power of municipality to agree to abide by conditions or regulations imposed by federal authority in respect of construction, maintenance, or operation of a municipal public utility plant or enterprise, 128 A.L.R. 620.

Public regulation of dry cleaning and dyeing establishments, 128 A.L.R. 678.

Statute relating to municipal fire departments as interference with local self-government, 141 A.L.R. 903.

Implied or inherent power of municipal corporation to sell its real property, 141 A.L.R. 1447.

Validity, construction, and application of municipal ordinances relating to loading or unloading passengers by interurban buses on streets, 144 A.L.R. 1119.

Certificates by state authorizing operation of motorbus lines over section of highway as affected by its subsequent annexation to city, 154 A.L.R. 1440.

Governmental body's right to enjoin breach of contract for unique or extraordinary services, 161 A.L.R. 881.

Power of municipal corporation to contribute financially to municipal league or other organizations of a similar character, 169 A.L.R. 1230.

Discrimination between property within and that outside municipality or other governmental district as to public service or utility rates, 4 A.L.R.2d 595.

Power of city, town, or county or their officials to compromise claim, 15 A.L.R.2d 1359.

Liability of municipality in damages for its refusal to grant permit, license, or franchise, 37 A.L.R.2d 694.

Power of municipality to sell, lease, or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 A.L.R.2d 595.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration, 20 A.L.R.3d 569.

Right of municipal corporation to recover back from contractor payments made under contract violating competitive bidding statute, 33 A.L.R.3d 397.

Validity and construction of municipal ordinances regulating community antenna television service (CATV), 41 A.L.R.3d 384.

Standing to contest award of, or acquisition of right to operate, cable TV certificate, license, or franchise in state court action, 78 A.L.R.3d 1255.

Validity, construction, and application of enactments relating to requirement of residency within or near specified governmental unit as condition of continued employment for policemen or firemen, 4 A.L.R.4th 380.

Placement, maintenance, or design of standing utility pole as affecting private utility's liability for personal injury resulting from vehicle's collision with pole within or beside highway, 51 A.L.R.4th 602.

Validity, construction, and application of state enactment, order, or regulation expressly prohibiting sexual orientation discrimination, 82 A.L.R.5th 1.

Construction and application of U.S. Const. Art. I, § 10, cl. 1, and state constitutional provisions proscribing state bills of attainder, 63 A.L.R.6th 1.

36-34-3. Acquisition and operation of certain buildings and facilities; contracts with other political subdivisions for joint use.

Statute text

In addition to the other powers it may have, any municipal corporation shall have the power, in the interest of the health and general welfare, to accept by gift, acquire, construct, lease, own, regulate, operate, improve, open, close, or extend public streets, alleys, sidewalks, parks, swimming pools, golf courses, recreation grounds, airports, airfields, parking areas, parking buildings, athletic fields, grandstands and stadia buildings used or useful for sports, buildings used or useful for housing fairs and exhibits, buildings for educational purposes, libraries, buildings used or useful for poultry and livestock shows and exhibits, and buildings used or useful for public amusement purposes, together with facilities or buildings used for any combination of the above. Any municipal corporation may, under this chapter, contract with any other political subdivision for the joint use of any of such facilities.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 4.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Municipal public libraries generally, § 20-5-20 et seq.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government and Contracts that Bind," see 3 Ga. L. Rev. 546 (1969). For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions prior to enactment of this section are included in the annotations for this Code section.

This power is broad enough to authorize the governing authorities to exercise poor judgment so long as it is the governing authorities' judgment and is not capricious and arbitrary. Goodman v. City of Atlanta, 246 Ga. 79, 268 S.E.2d 663 (1980).

Property dedicated to particular purpose cannot by the dedicatee, a municipality, be diverted from that purpose, except under the right of eminent domain. Donalson v. Georgia Power & Light Co., 175 Ga. 462, 165 S.E. 440 (1932) (decided under former law).

Occupant of city lot does not have any right in the name of an abutting municipal street as will preclude city governing authority from renaming the public thoroughfare. The only justiciable issue is whether the legislative action (naming or renaming the street) was taken for the public health or welfare or was, instead, accomplished arbitrarily, capriciously, maliciously, or with intent to cause injury to an abutting property owner or the general public. Goodman v. City of Atlanta, 246 Ga. 79, 268 S.E.2d 663 (1980).

Municipal corporation is without power to vacate a public thoroughfare unless authority to do so is conferred upon the municipal corporation in express terms or by necessary implication. City of Statesboro v. Dorman, 203 Ga. 25, 45 S.E.2d 403 (1947) (decided under former law).

Cited in Campbell v. City of Columbus, 224 Ga. 279, 161 S.E.2d 299 (1968); Jonesboro Area Athletic Ass'n v. Dickson, 227 Ga. 513, 181 S.E.2d 852 (1971); City of Gainesville v. Pritchett, 129 Ga. App. 475, 199 S.E.2d 889 (1973).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Regulation of vehicular weights. - By establishing truck routes, a city may effectively regulate the amount of weight which may be carried on designated streets on a municipal street system. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-20.

Any city or county ordinances purporting to regulate vehicular weights must not exceed maximum weights permitted by O.C.G.A. § 32-6-26. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-20.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 192, 470 et seq.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1143 et seq. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1169, 1171.

ALR. - Liability of municipal corporation upon implied contract for use of property which it received under an invalid contract, 42 A.L.R. 632.

Public "comfort stations," 42 A.L.R. 891; 55 A.L.R. 472.

Measure of damages or compensation where property is taken to widen street, 64 A.L.R. 1513.

Power to include in municipal contract or proposal therefor, provisions designed to relieve local unemployment, or encourage local industries, 81 A.L.R. 255.

Aggregate of rent for entire period of lease of property to municipality as present indebtedness for purposes of condition of incurring, or limitation of amount of, municipal debt, 112 A.L.R. 278.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivisions to engage in a joint project or enterprise, 123 A.L.R. 997.

Auditorium or stadium as public purpose for which public funds may be expended or taxing power exercised, 173 A.L.R. 415.

Necessity for adhering to statutory procedure prescribed for vacation, discontinuance, or change of route of street or highway, 175 A.L.R. 760.

Granting or taking of lease of property by municipality as within authorization of purchase or acquisition thereof, 11 A.L.R.2d 168.

Power of municipality to charge nonresidents higher fees than residents for use of municipal facilities, 57 A.L.R.3d 998.

Liability to one struck by golf ball, 53 A.L.R.4th 282.

36-34-4. Establishment of facilities and services for treatment of patients.

Statute text

In addition to the other powers it may have, the governing body of any municipal corporation may provide for the general health and welfare by establishing hospitals and clinics for the reception and treatment of charitable and pay patients. It shall have the power to contract with any state agency or political subdivision of this state to provide joint facilities or services for the care and treatment of patients.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Hospital authorities, T. 31, C. 7, A. 4.

Care of indigent and elderly patients, T. 31, C. 8.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 10, 11. 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Hospitals and Asylums, § 42 et seq. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 481.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 4, 6. 41 C.J.S., Hospitals, § 12 et seq.

ALR. - Power of municipality to acquire and operate ice plant, 68 A.L.R. 872.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivisions to engage in a joint project or enterprise, 123 A.L.R. 997.

Municipal power to condemn land for cemetery, 54 A.L.R.2d 1322.

Power of municipality to charge nonresidents higher fees than residents for use of municipal facilities, 57 A.L.R.3d 998.

36-34-5. Acquisition and construction of water and sewage systems.

Statute text

(a) In addition to the other powers which it may have, any municipal corporation shall have the power under this chapter:

(1) To acquire by gift, by purchase, or by the exercise of the right of eminent domain, to construct, to reconstruct, to improve, to better, and to extend any water system or sewage system, or both, within the municipal corporation;

(2) To acquire by gift, by purchase, or by the exercise of the right of eminent domain any lands, easements, rights in lands, and water rights in connection therewith;

(3) To operate and maintain any such systems for its own use and for:

(A) Public and private persons within the territorial boundaries of the municipal corporation who use the system; or

(B) Persons to whom the system is made available at the property owned by such persons; and

(4) To prescribe, revise, and collect rates, fees, tolls, or charges for the services, facilities, or commodities:

(A) Furnished to persons or users; or

(B) Made available by such systems to the property owner at such owner's property. When services are available but not used, the maximum rates, fees, tolls, or other charges imposed shall not exceed the minimum charge or fee imposed on a user of such system.

(b) The provisions of subparagraphs (a)(3)(B) and (a)(4)(B) of this Code section shall apply with respect to an individual residential property owner only in the case of a municipality or public water system or project thereof that is exempted from the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 36-60-17.1 pursuant to subsection (c) of such Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1393, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 737, § 1/HB 247.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Powers and duties of Environmental Protection Division of Department of Natural Resources pertaining to sewage systems, waste treatment works, § 12-5-20 et seq.

Contracts between Department of Natural Resources and municipalities pertaining to furnishing of water supplies, § 12-5-72.

Powers and duties of Environmental Protection Division of Department of Natural Resources with regard to public water systems, § 12-5-170 et seq.

Permits for operation of solid waste handling, disposal, facilities, § 12-8-20 et seq.

Retention of contractual payments and creation of escrow accounts in contracts for installation, improvement of water or sewer facilities, § 13-10-81.

Exercise of power of eminent domain for construction and operation of waterworks, § 22-3-60 et seq.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a comma was added following "tolls" in the last sentence of subdivision (4) (now subdivision (a)(4)(B)).

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government and Contracts that Bind," see 3 Ga. L. Rev. 546 (1969). For article advocating centralizing industrial and domestic waste treatment by local statutory amendments, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 603 (1972). For article surveying local government law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 313 (1985). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions prior to enactment of this Code section are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Property dedicated to a particular purpose cannot by the dedicatee, a municipality, be diverted from that purpose, except under the right of eminent domain. Donalson v. Georgia Power & Light Co., 175 Ga. 462, 165 S.E. 440 (1932) (decided under former law).

Power to condemn other property. - One municipality has power to condemn under reasonable circumstances the public property of other municipalities. Mays v. State, 110 Ga. App. 881, 140 S.E.2d 223 (1965).

City cannot compel use of city water. - There is nothing in the general authority conferred upon a city under the law set forth in this section in respect to the acquisition or construction of a water system, in addition to any powers a municipality may already have, whereby a city can compel the use of city water, or connection to a city water system. City of Midway v. Midway Nursing & Convalescent Ctr., Inc., 230 Ga. 77, 195 S.E.2d 452 (1973).

Nothing in the general authority conferred under O.C.G.A. § 36-34-5 in respect to the acquisition or construction of a water system, in addition to any powers a municipality may already have, empowers a city to compel the use of city water or connection to a city water system. Wall v. City of Athens, 663 F. Supp. 747 (M.D. Ga. 1987), aff'd sub nom., McCallum v. Athens, 976 F.2d 649 (11th Cir. 1992).

No power to conspire with private parties. - While O.C.G.A. § 36-34-5 does establish a policy to displace competition with regulation to some degree, and the legislation immunizes some of the anticompetitive activities engaged in by the defendant in providing water services outside the city from antitrust attack under the state action exemption, the legislation does not provide the state action exemption for contracting and conspiring with private parties, as opposed to political subdivisions, to maintain artificially low rates for these private parties in exchange for the private parties' agreement not to engage in direct competition, and maintenance of a discriminatory rate schedule, without cost justification, in order to make up for the losses incurred by such conduct. Wall v. City of Athens, 663 F. Supp. 747 (M.D. Ga. 1987), aff'd sub nom., McCallum v. Athens, 976 F.2d 649 (11th Cir. 1992).

Municipal corporation may not compel any person outside the municipal corporation's territorial limits to accept water service which the municipality undertakes to furnish, nor may the municipal authorities be compelled to render such service. City of Moultrie v. Burgess, 212 Ga. 22, 90 S.E.2d 1 (1955) (decided under former law).

Municipal corporation does not become in any sense a public utility by reason of the fact that the municipal corporation is empowered to operate, and does operate, electric light and water plant. City of Moultrie v. Burgess, 212 Ga. 22, 90 S.E.2d 1 (1955) (decided under former law).

Constitutionality of different rates for those residing outside corporate limits. - Plaintiffs, having no right to demand water service from the city, may purchase the water at the city's charge therefor, or plaintiffs may decline to do so, at plaintiffs' will, but the plaintiffs are in no position which authorizes the plaintiffs to complain of an excessive charge or a discriminating rate. Hence, there was no merit in the contention that the city's ordinances which fixed different water rates for those who resided outside of the city's corporate limits offended U.S. Const., amend. 14, or Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. II (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. II). City of Moultrie v. Burgess, 212 Ga. 22, 90 S.E.2d 1 (1955) (decided under former law).

Power to set rates in outlying territories. - Municipal corporation may classify rates to be charged in outlying territories, and upon failure of customers to pay such charges, the municipal corporation may discontinue the municipal corporation's service. City of Moultrie v. Burgess, 212 Ga. 22, 90 S.E.2d 1 (1955) (decided under former law).

Only "users" may be charged. - City is authorized to prescribe and collect rates, fees, and charges only for public and private consumers and users who actually use the city's sewer system. Hummings v. City of Woodbine, 253 Ga. 255, 319 S.E.2d 862 (1984).
